en: Lip pencils
ar: أقلام تحديد الشفاه
az: Dodaq qələmləri
bg: Моливи за устни
cs: Tužky na rty
da: Læbeblyanter
el: Μολύβια χειλιών
es: Lápices de labios
et: Huulepliiatsid
fa: مداد لب
fi: Huultenrajauskynät
fr: Crayons à lèvres
ga: Peann luaidhe liopaí
hr: Olovke za usne
hu: Ajakceruzák
hy: Շրթունքների մատիտներ
id: Pensil bibir
is: Varablýantar
it: Matite labbra
ja: リップペンシル
ka: ტუჩის ფანქრები
kk: Ерінге арналған қарындаштар
ko: 립 펜슬
ky: Эрин карандаштары
lt: Lūpų pieštukai
lv: Lūpu zīmuļi
mk: Моливи за усни
ms: Pensel bibir
mt: Lapsijiet tax-xufftejn
nl: Lippenpotloden
no: Lipplepper
pl: Konturówki do ust
pt: Lápis labiais
ro: Creioane de buze
ru: Карандаши для губ
sk: Ceruzky na pery
sl: Svinčniki za ustnice
sq: Lapsa për buzë
sr: Оловке за усне
sv: Läppennor
sw: Penseli za midomo
tg: Қаламҳои лаб
th: ดินสอเขียนขอบปาก
tk: Dodak galamlary
tr: Dudak kalemleri
uk: Олівці для губ
vi: Bút chì kẻ môi
zh: 唇线笔

en: Lip and cheek pencils
de: Lippen- und Wangenstifte
es: Lápices labiales y para mejillas
fr: Crayons à lèvres et joues

en: Lipsticks
ar: أحمر شفاه
az: Dodaq boyası
bg: Червила
cs: Rtěnky
da: Læbestift
el: Κραγιόν
es: Labiales, pintalabios
et: Huulepulgad
fa: رژ لب
fi: Huulipunat
fr: Rouges à lèvres, Rouge à lèvres
ga: Lipstick
hr: Ruževi za usne
hu: Rúzsok
hy: Շրթներկներ
id: Lipstik
is: Varalitur
it: Rossetti
ja: 口紅
ka: პომადები
kk: Далап ерін далабы
ko: 립스틱
ky: Эрин боёгу
lt: Lūpų dažai
lv: Lūpu krāsas
mk: Кармини за усни
ms: Gincu bibir
mt: Lipsticks
nl: Lippenstift
no: Leppestift
pl: Szminki
pt: Batons
ro: Rujuri
ru: Губная помада
sk: Rúže
sl: Šminke za ustnice
sq: Buzëkuq
sr: Кармини
sv: Läppstift
sw: Lipstick
tg: Помада
th: ลิปสติก
tk: Dodak boýagy
tr: Rujlar
uk: Губна помада
vi: Son môi
zh: 口红

en: Lip gloss, Gloss
de: Lipgloss, Gloss
es: Brillo de labios, Gloss
fr: Gloss
it: Lucidalabbra, Lip gloss
nl: Lipgloss
pt: Brilho labial, Gloss

en: Lip stickers
ar: ملصقات الشفاه
az: Dodaq stikerləri
bg: Стикери за устни
cs: Samolepky na rty
da: Læbeklistermærker
de: Lippenaufkleber
el: Αυτοκόλλητα χειλιών
es: Pegatinas para labios
et: Huulekleepsud
fa: برچسب لب
fi: Huulitarrat
fr: Stickers à lèvres, Sticker à lèvres
ga: Greamáin liopaí
hr: Naljepnice za usne
hu: Ajakmatricák
hy: Շրթունքների կպչուն պիտակներ
id: Stiker bibir
is: Varalímmi
it: Adesivi per labbra
ja: リップステッカー
ka: ტუჩის სტიკერები
kk: Ерінге арналған стикерлер
ko: 입술 스티커
ky: Эрин стикерлери
lt: Lūpų lipdukai
lv: Lūpu uzlīmes
mk: Налепници за усни
ms: Pelekat bibir
mt: Stikers tax-xufftejn
nl: Lipstickers
no: Leppeklistremerker
pl: Naklejki na usta
pt: Autocolantes para lábios
ro: Autocolante pentru buze
ru: Наклейки для губ
sk: Nálepky na pery
sl: Nalepke za ustnice
sq: Ngjitëse buzësh
sr: Налепнице за усне
sv: Läppstickers
sw: Vibandiko vya midomo
tg: Стикерҳои лаб
th: สติกเกอร์ติดริมฝีปาก
tk: Dodak stikerleri
tr: Dudak çıkartmaları
uk: Наліпки для губ
uz: Lab stikerlari
vi: Miếng dán môi
zh: 唇部贴纸

en: Suncare, Sun Care
fr: Solaire
it: Solari
nl: Zonverzorging
pt: Cuidados solares

en: In-sun protections
ar: واقيات الشمس
az: Günəşdən qoruyucu vasitələr
bg: Слънцезащитни продукти
bn: ইন-সান সুরক্ষা
ca: Proteccions solars
cs: Ochrana proti slunci
da: Solbeskyttelse
de: Sonnenschutz
el: Αντηλιακή προστασία
es: Protección solar
et: Päikesekaitse
fa: محافظت در برابر آفتاب
fi: Aurinkosuojat
fr: Protections solaires
ga: Cosaintí gréine
he: הגנות שמש
hr: Zaštita od sunca
hu: Napvédő termékek
hy: Արևապաշտպան միջոցներ
id: Perlindungan dari matahari
is: Sólarvarnir
it: Protezioni solari, Protezione solare
ka: მზისგან დამცავი საშუალებები
kk: Күннен қорғау
km: ការពារកម្តៅថ្ងៃ
ko: 자외선 차단제
ky: Күндөн коргоо
lt: Apsauga nuo saulės
lv: Aizsardzība pret sauli
mk: Заштита од сонце
ms: Perlindungan matahari
mt: Protezzjonijiet mix-xemx
nl: Zonbescherming, Zonnebrand
no: Solbeskyttelse
pl: Ochrona przed słońcem
pt: Protetores solares, Proteção solar
ro: Protecții solare
ru: Солнцезащитные средства
sk: Ochrana pred slnkom
sl: Zaščita pred soncem
sq: Mbrojtje nga dielli
sr: Заштита од сунца
sv: Solskydd
sw: Kinga dhidi ya jua
tg: Муҳофизат аз офтоб
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ป้องกันแสงแดด
tk: Günden goraýyş
tr: Güneşten korunma
uk: Захист від сонця
ur: سورج سے تحفظ
uz: Quyoshdan himoya
vi: Chống nắng

en: Sunscreen, Sunblock
ar: واقي شمسي
az: Günəş kremi
bg: Слънцезащитен крем
bn: সানস্ক্রিন, সানব্লক
ca: Protector solar
cs: Opalovací krém
da: Solcreme
de: Sonnencremes
el: Αντηλιακό
es: Protector solar
et: Päikesekaitsekreem
fa: کرم ضد آفتاب
fi: Aurinkovoide
fr: Crèmes solaires, crème solaire, Écrans solaires, Écran solaire
ga: Grianchosaint
he: קרם הגנה
hr: Krema za sunčanje
hu: Naptej
hy: Արևապաշտպան քսուք
id: Tabir surya
is: Sólarvörn
it: Crema solare
ka: მზისგან დამცავი კრემი
kk: Күннен қорғайтын крем
km: ឡេការពារកម្តៅថ្ងៃ
ko: 선크림
ky: Күндөн коргоочу крем
lt: Apsauginis kremas nuo saulės
lv: Sauļošanās krēms
mk: Крем за сончање
ms: Pelindung matahari
mt: Protezzjoni mix-xemx
nl: Zonnebrandcrème
no: Solkrem
pl: Krem przeciwsłoneczny
pt: Protetor solar
ro: Cremă de protecție solară
ru: Солнцезащитный крем
sk: Opaľovací krém
sl: Krema za sončenje
sq: Krem kundër diellit
sr: Крем за сунчање
sv: Solkräm
sw: Kinga ya jua
tg: Креми муҳофизаткунандаи офтоб
th: ครีมกันแดด
tk: Günden goraýjy krem
tr: Güneş kremi
uk: Сонцезахисний крем
ur: سن سکرین
uz: Quyoshdan himoya kremi
vi: Kem chống nắng

en: Lip balms with sun protection
fr: Baumes à lèvres solaires, Baume à lèvres solaire

en: Facial sunscreens, Face sunscreens
fr: Solaires visage, Solaire visage, Crèmes solaires visage
sv: Ansiktssolkrämer

fr: Après-solaires
en: After Sun Care
ar: العناية بعد التعرض للشمس
az: Günəşdən sonra qulluq
bg: Грижа след слънце
bn: সূর্যের পরে যত্ন
ca: Cura després del sol
cs: Péče po opalování
da: Efter solpleje
de: After-Sun-Pflege
el: Περιποίηση μετά τον ήλιο
es: Cuidado para después del sol
et: Pärast päikest hooldus
fa: مراقبت بعد از آفتاب
fi: Auringonoton jälkeinen hoito
ga: Cúram Iar-Ghréine
hr: Njega poslije sunčanja
hu: Napozás utáni ápolás
hy: Արևայրուքից հետո խնամք
id: Perawatan Setelah Terpapar Matahari
is: Eftir sól umhirðu
it: Doposole
ja: アフターサンケア
ka: მზის შემდგომი მოვლა
kk: Күннен кейінгі күтім
km: ការថែទាំក្រោយពេលថ្ងៃ
ko: 애프터 선 케어
ky: Күндөн кийинки кароо
lt: Priežiūra po saulės
lv: Kopšana pēc sauļošanās
mk: Нега после сончање
ms: Penjagaan Selepas Matahari
mt: Kura ta' wara x-Xemx
nl: Aftersun
no: Etter solpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja po opalaniu
pt: After Sun
ro: Îngrijire după plajă
ru: Уход после загара
sk: Starostlivosť po opaľovaní
sl: Nega po sončenju
sq: Kujdes pas diellit
sr: Нега после сунчања
sv: After Sun
sw: Utunzaji Baada ya Jua
tg: Нигоҳубини баъди офтоб
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลผิวหลังออกแดด
tk: Güneşden soň ideg
tr: Güneş sonrası bakım
uk: Догляд після засмаги
ur: سورج کے بعد کی دیکھ بھال
uz: Quyoshdan keyin parvarish
vi: Chăm sóc sau khi tắm nắng
zh: 晒后护理

en: Self-tanner, Self-tanning lotion
ar: لوشن تسمير ذاتي
az: Özünqaraldıcı losyon
bg: Лосион за автобронзиране
cs: Samoopalovací přípravek
da: Selvbruner
de: Selbstbräuner
el: Αυτομαυριστικό λοσιόν
es: Autobronceador
et: Isepruunistav losjoon
fa: لوسیون برنزه کننده
fi: Itseruskettava
fr: Autobronzants
ga: Lóis féin-tanaithe
hr: Losion za samotamnjenje
hu: Önbarnító krém
hy: Ինքնաներկող լոսյոն
id: Losion penyamakan kulit
is: Sjálfbrúnkulosjon
it: Autoabbronzante
ja: セルフタンニングローション
ka: ავტორუჯის ლოსიონი
kk: Өздігінен қоңырландырғыш лосьон
ko: 셀프 태닝 로션
ky: Өзүн-өзү күйгүзүүчү лосьон
lt: Savaiminio įdegio losjonas
lv: Paštonējošs losjons
mk: Лосион за самопотемнување
ms: Losen penyamakan sendiri
mt: Lozjon li jikkunza waħdu
nl: Zelfbruiner
no: Selvbruningskrem
pl: Balsam samoopalający
pt: Autobronzeador
ro: Loțiune autobronzantă
ru: Автозагар
sk: Samoopaľovací prípravok
sl: Losjon za samoporjavitev
sq: Losion për vetë-nxirje
sr: Лосион за самопотамњивање
sv: Brun utan sol
sw: Losheni ya kujichubua
tg: Лосёни худтанкунӣ
th: โลชั่นผิวสีแทน
tk: Öz-özünden garaldyryjy losýon
tr: Bronzlaştırıcı losyon
uk: Лосьйон для автозасмаги
uz: O'z-o'zidan qoraytiruvchi loson
vi: Kem làm nâu da
zh: 自晒黑乳液

en: Tan Preparers, Tan Preparer, Tanning lotions, Tanning lotion
ar: مستحضرات تحضير البشرة للبرونزاج
az: Qaralmağa hazırlayıcı vasitələr
bg: Продукти за подготовка за тен
bn: ট্যান প্রস্তুতি
ca: Preparadors del bronzejat
cs: Přípravky pro přípravu na opalování
da: Forberedelse til solbadning
de: Bräunungsbeschleuniger
el: Προπαρασκευαστικά μαυρίσματος
es: Preparadores del bronceado
et: Päevituseelne ettevalmistus
fa: آماده سازی برنزه کننده
fi: Rusketuksen valmisteluaineet
fr: Préparateurs de bronzage
ga: Ullmhóirí tan
hr: Pripravci za samotamnjenje
hu: Barnulást elősegítő készítmények
hy: Արևայրուքին նախապատրաստող միջոցներ
id: Persiapan sebelum berjemur
is: Undirbúningur fyrir brúnku
it: Preparatori per l'abbronzatura
ja: 日焼け準備剤
ka: გარუჯვის მოსამზადებელი საშუალებები
kk: Күнге күюге дайындық
km: ផលិតផលត្រៀមសម្រាប់ការ sunburn
ko: 태닝 준비제
ky: Күнгө күйүүгө даярдоочу каражаттар
lt: Pasiruošimas įdegiui
lv: Gatavošanās sauļošanai
mk: Подготовка за сончање
ms: Persediaan penyamakan
mt: Preparazzjoni għall-ikkunzar
nl: Bruiningsvoorbereiding
no: Forberedelse til soling
pl: Preparaty przygotowujące do opalania
pt: Preparadores de bronzeamento
ro: Preparate pentru bronzare
ru: Подготовка к загару
sk: Prípravky na prípravu na opaľovanie
sl: Priprava na sončenje
sq: Përgatitës për nxirje
sr: Припреме за сунчање
sv: Förberedelser för solning
sw: Maandalizi ya ngozi kwa ajili ya kuchubua
tg: Омодагӣ барои офтобпарастӣ
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์เตรียมผิวก่อนอาบแดด
tk: Günüň täsirine taýýarlyk
tr: Bronzlaşmaya hazırlık ürünleri
uk: Підготовка до засмаги
ur: ٹین کی تیاری
uz: Qorayishga tayyorgarlik
vi: Chuẩn bị trước khi tắm nắng
zh: 晒黑准备

en: Perfumes, Fragrances, Perfume & Cologne
ar: عطور
az: Ətirlər
bg: Парфюми
cs: Parfémy, Parfémy a kolínské vody
da: Parfumer, Parfume og eau de cologne
de: Parfüms, Düfte
el: Αρώματα
es: Perfumes, Perfumes y colonias
et: Parfüümid
fa: عطر
fi: Hajuvedet
fr: Parfums, Parfums et eaux de Cologne
ga: Cumhráin
hr: Parfemi
hu: Parfümök
hy: Օծանելիքներ
id: Parfum
is: Ilmvötn
it: Profumi, Profumi e colonie
ja: 香水, 香水・オーデコロン
ka: სუნამოები
kk: Әтірлер
ko: 향수
ky: Атырлар
lt: Kvepalai
lv: Smaržas
mk: Парфеми
ms: Minyak wangi
mt: Fwejjaħ
nb: Parfymer, Parfyme for han og henne
nl: Parfums, Parfum
pl: Perfumy, Perfumy i wody kolońskie
pt: Perfumes, Perfume e colônia
ro: Parfumuri
ru: Духи, Парфюмерия
sk: Parfémy
sl: Parfumi
sq: Parfume
sr: Парфеми
sv: Parfymer, Parfym och cologne
sw: Manukato
tg: Аттор
th: น้ำหอม
tk: Atyrlar
tr: Parfümler, Parfüm ve Kolonya
uk: Парфуми
uz: Atirlar
vi: Nước hoa
zh: 香水

en: Men perfumes, Men perfume, Men fragrances, Men fragrance, Male perfume, Male perfumes
ar: عطور رجالية
az: Kişi ətirləri
bg: Мъжки парфюми
cs: Pánské parfémy
da: Herreparfumer
de: Herrenparfums
el: Ανδρικά αρώματα
es: Perfumes de hombre
et: Meeste parfüümid
fa: عطر مردانه
fi: Miesten parfyymit
fr: Parfums homme, Parfums hommes, Parfum homme, Parfum hommes
ga: Cumhráin fir
hr: Muški parfemi
hu: Férfi parfümök
hy: Տղամարդու օծանելիքներ
id: Parfum pria
is: Herrailmvatn
it: Profumi da uomo
ja: 男性用香水
ka: მამაკაცის სუნამოები
kk: Ерлерге арналған парфюмерия
ko: 남성 향수
ky: Эркектердин атырлары
lt: Vyriški kvepalai
lv: Vīriešu smaržas
mk: Машки парфеми
ms: Minyak wangi lelaki
mt: Fwejjaħ tal-irġiel
nl: Herenparfums
no: Parfymer for menn
pl: Perfumy męskie
pt: Perfumes masculinos
ro: Parfumuri pentru bărbați
ru: Мужские духи
sk: Pánske parfémy
sl: Moški parfumi
sq: Parfume për burra
sr: Мушки парфеми
sv: Parfymer för män
sw: Manukato ya wanaume
tg: Атторҳои мардона
th: น้ำหอมสำหรับผู้ชาย
tk: Erkek atyrlary
tr: Erkek parfümleri
uk: Чоловічі парфуми
uz: Erkaklar uchun atirlar
vi: Nước hoa nam
zh: 男士香水

en: Women perfumes, Women perfume, Women fragrances, Women fragrance, Female perfume, Female perfumes
ar: عطور نسائية
az: Qadın ətirləri
bg: Дамски парфюми
cs: Dámské parfémy
da: Dameparfumer
de: Damenparfums
el: Γυναικεία αρώματα
es: Perfumes de mujer
et: Naiste parfüümid
fa: عطر زنانه
fi: Naisten parfyymit
fr: Parfums femme, Parfums femmes, Parfum femme, Parfum femmes
ga: Cumhráin ban
hr: Ženski parfemi
hu: Női parfümök
hy: Կանացի օծանելիքներ
id: Parfum wanita
is: Kvenna ilmvatn
it: Profumi da donna
ja: 女性用香水
ka: ქალის სუნამოები
kk: Әйелдерге арналған парфюмерия
ko: 여성 향수
ky: Аялдардын атырлары
lt: Moteriški kvepalai
lv: Sieviešu smaržas
mk: Женски парфеми
ms: Minyak wangi wanita
mt: Fwejjaħ tan-nisa
nl: Damesparfums
no: Parfymer for kvinner
pl: Perfumy damskie
pt: Perfumes femininos
ro: Parfumuri pentru femei
ru: Женские духи
sk: Dámske parfémy
sl: Ženski parfumi
sq: Parfume për femra
sr: Женски парфеми
sv: Parfymer för kvinnor
sw: Manukato ya wanawake
tg: Атторҳои занона
th: น้ำหอมสำหรับผู้หญิง
tk: Aýal atyrlary
tr: Kadın parfümleri
uk: Жіночі парфуми
uz: Ayollar uchun atirlar
vi: Nước hoa nữ
zh: 女士香水

en: Kids perfumes, Kids fragrances
ar: عطور للأطفال
az: Uşaq ətirləri
bg: Детски парфюми
cs: Dětské parfémy
da: Børneparfymer
de: Kinderparfüms
el: Παιδικά αρώματα
es: Perfumes para niños
et: Lasteparfüümid
fa: عطر کودکانه
fi: Lasten hajuvedet
fr: Parfums enfants, Parfums enfant, Parfum enfants, Parfum enfant
ga: Cumhráin páistí
hr: Dječji parfemi
hu: Gyerekparfümök
hy: Մանկական օծանելիքներ
id: Parfum anak-anak
is: Barna ilmvatn
it: Profumi per bambini
ja: 子供用香水
ka: საბავშვო სუნამოები
kk: Балаларға арналған парфюмерия
ko: 어린이 향수
ky: Балдар үчүн атырлар
lt: Vaikiški kvepalai
lv: Bērnu smaržas
mk: Детски парфеми
ms: Minyak wangi kanak-kanak
mt: Fwejjaħ tat-tfal
nl: Kinderparfums
no: Parfymer for barn
pl: Perfumy dla dzieci
pt: Perfumes infantis
ro: Parfumuri pentru copii
ru: Детские духи
sk: Detské parfémy
sl: Otroški parfumi
sq: Parfume për fëmijë
sr: Дечји парфеми
sv: Parfymer för barn
sw: Manukato ya watoto
tg: Атторҳои бачагона
th: น้ำหอมสำหรับเด็ก
tk: Çagalar üçin atyrlar
tr: Çocuk parfümleri
uk: Дитячі парфуми
uz: Bolalar uchun atirlar
vi: Nước hoa trẻ em
zh: 儿童香水

en: Eau de toilette
ar: ماء تواليت
az: Tualet suyu
bg: Тоалетна вода
bn: টয়লেট জল
ca: Aigua de tocador
cs: Toaletní voda
da: Eau de toilette
de: Eau de Toilette
el: Eau de toilette
es: Eau de toilette
et: Tualettvesi
fa: ادو تویلت
fi: Eau de toilette
fr: Eaux de toilette, Eau de toilette
ga: Eau de toilette
he: או דה טואלט
hr: Toaletna voda
hu: Eau de toilette
hy: Զուգարանի ջուր
id: Eau de toilette
is: Eau de toilette
it: Eau de toilette
ja: オードトワレ
ka: ტუალეტის წყალი
kk: Әтір суы
km: Eau de toilette
ko: 오 드 뚜왈렛
ky: Туалет суусу
lt: Tualetinis vanduo
lv: Tualetes ūdens
mk: Тоалетна вода
ms: Eau de toilette
mt: Eau de toilette
nl: Eau de toilette
no: Eau de toilette
pl: Woda toaletowa
pt: Eau de toilette
ro: Apă de toaletă
ru: Туалетная вода
sk: Toaletná voda
sl: Toaletna voda
sq: Eau de tualetit
sr: Тоалетна вода
sv: Eau de toilette
sw: Eau de toilette
tg: Оби ҳоҷатхона
th: โอเดอทอยเลตต์
tk: Tualet suwy
tr: Eau de toilette
uk: Туалетна вода
ur: ایو ڈی ٹوائلٹ
uz: Tualet suvi
vi: Eau de toilette
zh: 淡香水

en: Cologne, Eau de Cologne
ar: كولونيا ، ماء كولونيا
az: Köln, odekolon
bg: Кьолнска вода, одеколон
bn: কোলোন, ও ডি কোলোন
ca: Colònia, Aigua de Colònia
cs: Kolínská voda
da: Köln, Eau de Cologne
de: Kölnisch Wasser, Eau de Cologne
el: Κολόνια, Eau de Cologne
es: Colonia, Agua de Colonia
et: Kölni vesi, odekolonn
fa: ادکلن، ادوکلن
fi: Kölninvettä, Eau de Cologne
fr: Eaux de Cologne, Eau de Cologne
ga: Köln, Eau de Cologne
he: קלן, או דה קלן
hr: Kolonjska voda
hu: Kölni, Eau de Cologne
hy: Օդեկոլոն
id: Cologne, Eau de Cologne
is: Kölnarvatn
it: Acqua di Colonia
ja: オーデコロン
ka: ოდეკოლონი
kk: Кёльн суы, одеколон
km: កូឡាជែន, អូដឺកូឡូន
ko: 콜론, 오드 콜로뉴
ky: Кельн суусу, одеколон
lt: Kelnas, odekolonas
lv: Ķelnes ūdens, odekolons
mk: Келнска вода, колонска вода
ms: Cologne, Eau de Cologne
mt: Cologne, Eau de Cologne
nl: Keulen, Eau de Cologne
no: Köln, Eau de Cologne
pl: Woda kolońska
pt: Colônia, Água de Colônia
ro: Colonie, apă de colonie
ru: Кёльнская вода, одеколон
sk: Kolínska voda
sl: Kolonjska voda
sq: Kolonjë, Eau de Cologne
sr: Келнска вода, колонска вода
sv: Köln, Eau de Cologne
sw: Cologne, Eau de Cologne
tg: Кёльн, одеколони
th: โคโลญ, โอเดอโคโลญจน์
tk: Köln, atyr
tr: Kolonya, Eau de Cologne
uk: Кельнська вода, одеколон
ur: کولون، ایو ڈی کولون
uz: Köln, odekolon
vi: Cô-lô-nhơ, Eau de Cologne
zh: 科隆香水

en: Body mists, Body sprays
fr: Brumes corporelles, Brumes corporelle, Brume corporelles, Brume corporelle